src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Sakirabiá language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Cases
+Sg+Nom:     PX-MARKING_OR_NOT   ;
+Sg+Abl:%^WG%>%{eV%}ri    PX-MARKING_OR_NOT   ;
+Sg+Com:%^WG%>%{eØ%}sẽp    PX-MARKING_OR_NOT   ;
+Sg+Dat:%^WG%>%{bmØ%}%{õo%}    PX-MARKING_OR_NOT   ;
+Sg+Loc:%^WG%>%{eØ%}se    PX-MARKING_OR_NOT   ;! kaa{pb} WG >{eØ}se ==> kaabese
+Coll+Nom:%^WG%>iat    PX-MARKING_OR_NOT   ;
!#:0   Nouns   ;

LEXICON PX-MARKING_OR_NOT
@D.PERS-NUM@ K ;
 PX-MARKING ;

LEXICON PX-MARKING
@R.PERS-NUM.SG1@+PxSg1:@R.PERS-NUM.SG1@ K ;
@R.PERS-NUM.SG2@+PxSg2:@R.PERS-NUM.SG2@ K ;
@R.PERS-NUM.SG3@+PxSg3:@R.PERS-NUM.SG3@ K ; 
@R.PERS-NUM.SG3c@+PxSg3c:@R.PERS-NUM.SG3c@ K ;
@R.PERS-NUM.PL12@+PxPl1Incl:@R.PERS-NUM.PL12@ K ;
@R.PERS-NUM.PL1@+PxPl1Excl:@R.PERS-NUM.PL1@ K ;
@R.PERS-NUM.PL2@+PxPl2:@R.PERS-NUM.PL2@ K ;
@R.PERS-NUM.PL3@+PxPl3:@R.PERS-NUM.PL3@ K ; 
@R.PERS-NUM.PL3c@+PxPl3c:@R.PERS-NUM.PL3c@ K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
